stCoCServer/stCoCClient/data/spell/ru-RU/ru-RU.aff
SFX B Y 25
SFX B ть й [аея]ть
SFX B ться йся [аея]ться
SFX B ть йте [аея]ть
SFX B ться йтесь [аея]ться
SFX B ить и ить
SFX B ь е ить
SFX B ться сь иться
SFX B ться тесь иться
SFX B оть и оть
SFX B оть ите оть
SFX B оться ись оться
SFX B оться итесь оться
SFX B уть и уть
SFX B уть ите уть
SFX B уться ись уться
SFX B уться итесь уться
SFX B ыть ой ыть
SFX B ыть ойте ыть
SFX B ыться ойся ыться
SFX B ыться ойтесь ыться
SFX B 0 те [ий]
SFX B сь тесь ись
SFX B ся тесь йся
SFX B 0 те [^ст]ь
SFX B ся тесь [^т]ься
SFX T Y 38
SFX T овать уй овать
SFX T оваться уйся оваться
SFX T овать уйте овать
SFX T оваться уйтесь оваться
SFX T евать уй [жшщчц]евать
SFX T евать уйте [жшщчц]евать
SFX T еваться уйся [жшщчц]еваться
SFX T еваться уйтесь [жшщчц]еваться
SFX T евать юй [^жшщчц]евать
SFX T евать юйте [^жшщчц]евать
SFX T еваться юйся [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX T еваться юйтесь [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX T ать и [жч]ать
SFX T аться ись [жч]аться
SFX T сать ши сать
SFX T сать шите сать
SFX T саться шись саться
SFX T саться шитесь саться
SFX T ить й [аео]ить
SFX T ить йте [аео]ить
SFX T иться йся [аео]иться
SFX T иться йтесь [аео]иться
SFX T ить ь [^аео]ить
SFX T ить ьте [^аео]ить
SFX T иться ься [^аео]иться
SFX T иться ьтесь [^аео]иться
SFX T уть ь уть
SFX T уть ьте уть
SFX T уться ься уться
SFX T уться ьтесь уться
SFX T ять й [аеоу]ять
SFX T ять йте [аеоу]ять
SFX T яться йся [аеоу]яться
SFX T яться йтесь [аеоу]яться
SFX T еть и еть
SFX T еться ись еться
SFX T еть ите еть
SFX T еться итесь еться
SFX P Y 12
SFX P ть я [ае]ть
SFX P ться ясь [ае]ться
SFX P ть я [^аеоу]ять
SFX P ться ясь [^аеоу]яться
SFX P ять я [аеоу]ять
SFX P ться сь [аеоу]яться
SFX P ить я [^жчшщ]ить
SFX P иться ясь [^жчшщ]иться
SFX P ить а [жчшщ]ить
SFX P иться ась [жчшщ]иться
SFX P ыть оя ыть
SFX P ыться оясь ыться
SFX Q Y 6
SFX Q евать уя [жшщчц]евать
SFX Q еваться уясь [жшщчц]еваться
SFX Q евать юя [^жшщчц]евать
SFX Q еваться юясь [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX Q овать уя овать
SFX Q оваться уясь оваться
SFX R Y 4
SFX R ть в [аеиоуыя]ть
SFX R ться вшись [аеиоуыя]ться
SFX R сть в сть
SFX R сться вшись сться
SFX Z Y 3
SFX Z ый о [влнрт]ый
SFX Z ий и [сц]кий
SFX Z ий е щий
SFX A Y 90
SFX A ый ого [^ц]ый
SFX A ый его цый
SFX A ый ому [^ц]ый
SFX A ый ему цый
SFX A й м ый
SFX A ый ом [^ц]ый
SFX A ый ем цый
SFX A й е ый
SFX A й х ый
SFX A й ми ый
SFX A ый ая ый
SFX A ый ой [^ц]ый
SFX A ый ою [^ц]ый
SFX A ый ей цый
SFX A ый ую ый
SFX A ый ое [^ц]ый
SFX A ый ее цый
SFX A ий ого [гкх]ий
SFX A ий ому [гкх]ий
SFX A й м [гкх]ий
SFX A ий ом [гкх]ий
SFX A й е [гкх]ий
SFX A й х [гкх]ий
SFX A й ми [гкх]ий
SFX A ий ая [гкх]ий
SFX A ий ой [гкх]ий
SFX A ий ою [гкх]ий
SFX A ий ую [гкх]ий
SFX A ий ое [гкх]ий
SFX A ий его [жнршщч]ий
SFX A ий ему [жнршщч]ий
SFX A й м [жнршщч]ий
SFX A ий ем [жнршщч]ий
SFX A й е [жнршщч]ий
SFX A й х [жнршщч]ий
SFX A й ми [жнршщч]ий
SFX A ийся егося [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся емуся [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся имся [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся емся [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся иеся [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся ихся [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся имися [шщ]ийся
SFX A ий яя ний
SFX A ий ая [жшщч]ий
SFX A ий ей [жншщч]ий
SFX A ий ею [жншщч]ий
SFX A ий юю ний
SFX A ий ую [жшщч]ий
SFX A ий ее [жншщч]ий
SFX A ийся аяся [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся ейся [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся еюся [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся уюся [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся ееся [шщ]ийся
SFX A й ю ой
SFX A ой ого ой
SFX A ой ому ой
SFX A ой им [гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A ой ым [^гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A ой ом ой
SFX A ой ие [гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A ой ые [^гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A ой их [гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A ой ых [^гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A ой ими [гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A ой ыми [^гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A ой ая ой
SFX A ой ую ой
SFX A ой ое ой
SFX A 0 ого ин
SFX A 0 ому ин
SFX A 0 ым ин
SFX A 0 ом ин
SFX A 0 а ин
SFX A 0 ой ин
SFX A 0 у ин
SFX A 0 о ин
SFX A 0 ы ин
SFX A 0 ых ин
SFX A 0 ыми ин
SFX A 0 а в
SFX A 0 о в
SFX A 0 у в
SFX A 0 ой в
SFX A 0 ом в
SFX A 0 ы в
SFX A 0 ых в
SFX A 0 ым в
SFX A 0 ыми в
SFX S Y 30
SFX S ый 0 [^н]ый
SFX S ый а [^н]ый
SFX S ый о [^н]ый
SFX S ый ы [^н]ый
SFX S ный ен [^ейлнь]ный
SFX S ный н еный
SFX S йный ен йный
SFX S ный он лный
SFX S ьный ен ьный
SFX S ный на [^н]ный
SFX S ный но [^н]ный
SFX S ный ны [^н]ный
SFX S кий ок [^аеийоуыь]кий
SFX S кий к [аеиоуы]кий
SFX S йкий ек йкий
SFX S ький ек ький
SFX S ий 0 [гжчхщ]ий
SFX S ий а [гжкхчщ]ий
SFX S ий о [гкх]ий
SFX S ий е [жчщ]ий
SFX S ий и [гжкхчщ]ий
SFX S ой 0 ой
SFX S ой а ой
SFX S ой о ой
SFX S ой ы [^гх]ой
SFX S ой и [гх]ой
SFX S нный н нный
SFX S ный а нный
SFX S ный о нный
SFX S ный ы нный
SFX X Y 3
SFX X ый а нный
SFX X ый о нный
SFX X ый ы нный
SFX E Y 12
SFX E ый ее ый
SFX E ый ей ый
SFX E е й ее
SFX E ь я ь
SFX E ь ю ь
SFX E ь ем ь
SFX E ь е ь
SFX E я и я
SFX E я е [^и]я
SFX E я ю я
SFX E я ей я
SFX E я ею я
SFX I Y 30
SFX I а ы [^гжкхчшщ]а
SFX I а и [гжкхчшщ]а
SFX I а е а
SFX I а у а
SFX I а ой [^жцчшщ]а
SFX I а ою [^жцчшщ]а
SFX I а ей [цчшщ]а
SFX I а ею [цчшщ]а
SFX I а 0 [^к]а
SFX I ка ок [^аежийоуцчшьыюя]ка
SFX I ка к [аеиоуыюя]ка
SFX I ка ек [жцчш]ка
SFX I йка ек йка
SFX I ька ек ька
SFX I 0 м а
SFX I 0 ми а
SFX I 0 х а
SFX I я и я
SFX I я е [^и]я
SFX I я ю я
SFX I я ей я
SFX I я ею я
SFX I я й [еиу]я
SFX I ня ен [^аезийоуыья]ня
SFX I я ь [аеиоуыя]ня
SFX I йня ен йня
SFX I ьня ен ьня
SFX I 0 м я
SFX I 0 ми я
SFX I 0 х я
SFX H Y 13
SFX H а ы [^гжкхчшщ]а
SFX H а и [гжкхчшщ]а
SFX H а е а
SFX H а у а
SFX H а ой [^жцчшщ]а
SFX H а ою [^жцчшщ]а
SFX H а ей ща
SFX H а ею ща
SFX H я и я
SFX H я е [^и]я
SFX H я ю я
SFX H я ей я
SFX H я ею я
SFX K Y 55
SFX K 0 а [^ейоь]
SFX K 0 у [^ейоь]
SFX K 0 ом [^ежйоцчшщь]
SFX K 0 е [^ейоь]
SFX K 0 ы [^гежйкохчшщь]
SFX K 0 и [гжкхчшщ]
SFX K 0 ей [жчшщ]
SFX K 0 ов [^ежйоцчшщь]
SFX K 0 ам [^ейоь]
SFX K 0 ами [^ейоь]
SFX K 0 ах [^ейоь]
SFX K й я й
SFX K й ю й
SFX K й ем й
SFX K й е [^и]й
SFX K й и ий
SFX K й и [аеоуюя]й
SFX K й ев й
SFX K й ям й
SFX K й ями й
SFX K й ях й
SFX K ь я ь
SFX K ь ю ь
SFX K ь ем ь
SFX K ь е ь
SFX K ь и ь
SFX K ь ей ь
SFX K ь ям ь
SFX K ь ями ь
SFX K ь ях ь
SFX K е я [^жцшщ]е
SFX K е а [жцшщ]е
SFX K е ю [^жцшщ]е
SFX K е у [жцшщ]е
SFX K 0 м е
SFX K е и ие
SFX K е ей [^жицщь]е
SFX K ще щ ще
SFX K е й ие
SFX K ье ий ье
SFX K е ям [^жцшщ]е
SFX K е ам [жцшщ]е
SFX K е ями [^жцшщ]е
SFX K е ами [жцшщ]е
SFX K е ях [^жцшщ]е
SFX K е ах [жцшщ]е
SFX K о а о
SFX K о у о
SFX K 0 м о
SFX K о е о
SFX K о и [ичш]ко
SFX K о 0 [вгдст]о
SFX K о ам о
SFX K о ами о
SFX K о ах о
SFX J Y 23
SFX J 0 а [^ейоь]
SFX J 0 у [^ейоь]
SFX J 0 ом [^ежйоцчшщь]
SFX J 0 е [^ейоь]
SFX J й я й
SFX J й ю й
SFX J й ем й
SFX J й е [^и]й
SFX J й и ий
SFX J ь я ь
SFX J ь ю ь
SFX J ь ем ь
SFX J ь е ь
SFX J е я [^жцшщ]е
SFX J е а [жцшщ]е
SFX J е ю [^жцшщ]е
SFX J е у [жцшщ]е
SFX J 0 м е
SFX J е и ие
SFX J о а о
SFX J о у о
SFX J 0 м о
SFX J о е о
SFX N Y 17
SFX N ь и ь
SFX N 0 ю ь
SFX N ь ей ь
SFX N ь ам [жчшщ]ь
SFX N ь ям [^жчшщ]ь
SFX N ь ами [жчшщ]ь
SFX N ь ями [^жчшщ]ь
SFX N ь ах [жчшщ]ь
SFX N ь ях [^жчшщ]ь
SFX N 0 а [^ь]
SFX N 0 у [^ь]
SFX N 0 ом [^жцчшщь]
SFX N 0 е [^ь]
SFX N 0 ов [^жцчшщь]
SFX N 0 ам [^ь]
SFX N 0 ами [^ь]
SFX N 0 ах [^ь]
SFX F Y 20
SFX F ь и ь
SFX F 0 ю ь
SFX F а ой а
SFX F а у а
SFX F ая ой ая
SFX F ая ую ая
SFX F ок ка нок
SFX F ок ку нок
SFX F ок ком нок
SFX F ок ке нок
SFX F енок ята енок
SFX F онок ата онок
SFX F енок ят енок
SFX F онок ат онок
SFX F енок ятам енок
SFX F онок атам онок
SFX F енок ятами енок
SFX F онок атами онок
SFX F енок ятах енок
SFX F онок атах онок
